District of Columbia statutes.
42-3635

Default judgment.

Expired.

History

June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-139, § 6, 37 DCR 2645
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-176, § 2(e), 43 DCR 4234

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2559.5.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(e) of the Drug House Abatement Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-446, December 5, 1996, 43 DCR 6664).

Expiration of Law

Expiration of Law 8-139

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 42-3631.